District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.49

Other procedures and programs.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish policies and procedures to maximize the participation of certified business enterprises in the contracting and procurement processes, including:

(1)

A procedure whereby an agency may waive bid security requirements on contracts in excess of $100,000, where the waiver is appropriate to achieve the purposes of this subchapter; and

(2)

A policy whereby an agency shall make advance payments to a certified contractor, where the payments are necessary to achieve the purposes of this subchapter; provided, that an agency shall not be permitted to advance more than 10% of the total value of any contract.

(b)

The Mayor may establish a pilot set-aside program for small business enterprises with gross revenues of $5 million or less.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2349, 52 DCR 7503
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-207, § 2(k), 55 DCR 6107
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(z), 61 DCR 3892

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-207, in subsec. (a), substituted “certified” for “small, local, and disadvantaged”.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108, in (a)(2), substituted “agency may” for “agency shall” and added “provided, that an agency shall not be permitted to advance more than 10% of the total value of any contract.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2349 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.